Colorado statutes. TITLE 33 Parks and Wildlife
ARTICLE 1 WILDLIFE - GENERAL PROVISIONS
33-1-112.5. Backcountry search and rescue fund - repeal.

[Editor's note: This version of subsection (1) is effective until January 1, 2023.] There is hereby created in the state treasury a backcountry search and rescue fund. Such fund is established to assist any agency or political subdivision of the state of Colorado for costs incurred in backcountry search and rescue activities involving persons holding hunting or fishing licenses; vessel, snowmobile, or off-highway vehicle registrations; or a Colorado outdoor recreation backcountry search and rescue card. Reimbursable costs are limited to actual operational expenses. Reimbursable costs shall not include salaries paid to persons permanently employed by the agency or political subdivision.

(1) [Editor's note: This version of subsection (1) is effective January 1, 2023.]

There is created in the state treasury a backcountry search and rescue fund, referred to in this section as the "fund". The fund consists of money credited to the fund pursuant to this section and section 33-12-108 (4)(e)(I)(B), and any other money that the general assembly may appropriate or transfer to the fund.

The state treasurer shall credit all interest and income derived from the deposit and investment of money in the fund to the fund.

Money in the fund is continuously appropriated to the department for use by the division as follows:

The division may use money credited to the fund pursuant to subsection (9) of this section and section 33-12-108 (4)(e)(I)(B), and any other money that the general assembly may appropriate or transfer to the fund to:

Support the goals stated in section 33-12-108 (2)(a)(IV)(C);

Support the needs of backcountry search and rescue activities in accordance with the recommendations of the study completed pursuant to section 33-10-116; and

Cover response costs, equipment, and other related expenses for backcountry search and rescue activities.

The division may use money credited to the fund pursuant to subsection (2) of this section to assist any agency or political subdivision of the state of Colorado for costs incurred in backcountry search and rescue activities involving persons holding hunting or fishing licenses; vessel, snowmobile, or off-highway vehicle registrations; or a Colorado outdoor recreation backcountry search and rescue card pursuant to subsection (3) of this section. Reimbursable costs are limited to actual operational expenses. Reimbursable costs do not include salaries paid to persons permanently employed by the agency or political subdivision.

The division may use a portion of the money in the fund for the direct and indirect costs of administering this section.

[Editor's note: This version of subsection (2) is effective until January 1, 2023.]

A surcharge of twenty-five cents shall be assessed on each license listed in section 33-4-102 (1) and (1.4) that is sold by the division or one of its license agents pursuant to section 33-4-101. Receipts and interest from the surcharge shall be deposited in the backcountry search and rescue fund created in subsection (1) of this section.

A surcharge of twenty-five cents shall be assessed on each vessel, each snowmobile, and each off-highway vehicle registration that is sold by the division or one of its agents pursuant to section 33-13-103, 33-14-102, or 33-14.5-102. Receipts and interest from the surcharge shall be deposited in the backcountry search and rescue fund created in subsection (1) of this section. To coincide with annual registration renewal schedules, the surcharge shall be assessed on an annual basis beginning on October 1, 1992, for snowmobile registrations, January 1, 1993, for vessel registrations, and April 1, 1993, for off-highway vehicle registrations.

The general assembly hereby creates the Colorado outdoor recreation backcountry search and rescue card program. The department of local affairs shall make a Colorado outdoor recreation backcountry search and rescue card available to the public in accordance with this subsection (2)(c) to backpackers, hikers, mountain and trail bikers, cross country skiers, and other persons who use the Colorado backcountry for recreation. The department of local affairs shall establish procedures for the licensing of vendors who sell the outdoor recreation backcountry search and rescue card, the printing of such cards, and the distribution of such cards to vendors for sale to the public.

The Colorado outdoor recreation backcountry search and rescue card shall cost three dollars and shall be valid for one year from the date of purchase. The department shall charge vendors two dollars for each Colorado outdoor recreation backcountry search and rescue card, which shall be transmitted to the state treasurer, who shall credit the amount to the backcountry search and rescue fund created in subsection (1) of this section. The remaining one dollar shall be retained by the vendor as the vendor's fee.

The department may issue a multi-year Colorado outdoor recreation backcountry search and rescue card that shall be valid for a period not to exceed five years. Such multi-year card may be offered at a reduced rate to vendors with a reduced vendor fee to reflect administrative cost savings and other considerations.

The general assembly finds and declares that the Colorado outdoor recreation backcountry search and rescue card program is a new program. The department of local affairs is therefore authorized to contract, pursuant to section 24-50-504 (2)(b), with a person, corporation, or entity for any elements of the administration of the program created by this subsection (2)(c).

(2) [Editor's note: This version of subsection (2) is effective January 1, 2023.]

(a) (I) Until the commission establishes a new amount in rules promulgated pursuant to subsection (2)(a)(II) of this section, a surcharge of twenty-five cents shall be assessed on each license listed in section 33-4-102 (1) and (1.4) that is sold by the division or one of its license agents pursuant to section 33-4-101. Receipts and interest from the surcharge shall be deposited in the backcountry search and rescue fund created in subsection (1) of this section.

(II) On or after January 1, 2023, the commission shall promulgate rules establishing the amount of the surcharge that shall be assessed on each license listed in section 33-4-102 (1) and (1.4) that is sold by the division or one of its license agents pursuant to section 33-4-101. Receipts and interest from the surcharge shall be deposited in the backcountry search and rescue fund created in subsection (1) of this section.

(b) (I) Until the commission establishes a new amount in rules promulgated pursuant to subsection (2)(b)(II) of this section, a surcharge of twenty-five cents shall be assessed on each vessel, each snowmobile, and each off-highway vehicle registration that is sold by the division or one of its agents pursuant to section 33-13-103, 33-14-102, or 33-14.5-102. Receipts and interest from the surcharge shall be deposited in the backcountry search and rescue fund created in subsection (1) of this section.

(II) On or after January 1, 2023, the commission shall promulgate rules establishing the amount of the surcharge that shall be assessed on each vessel, each snowmobile, and each off-highway vehicle registration that is sold by the division or one of its agents pursuant to section 33-13-103, 33-14-102, or 33-14.5-102. Receipts and interest from the surcharge shall be deposited in the backcountry search and rescue fund created in subsection (1) of this section.

(c) (I) The general assembly hereby creates the Colorado outdoor recreation backcountry search and rescue card program. The division shall make a Colorado outdoor recreation backcountry search and rescue card available to the public in accordance with this subsection (2)(c) to backpackers, hikers, mountain and trail bikers, cross country skiers, and other persons who use the Colorado backcountry for recreation. The division shall establish procedures for the licensing of vendors who sell the outdoor recreation backcountry search and rescue card, the printing of such cards, and the distribution of such cards to vendors for sale to the public.

(II) (A) Until the commission establishes a new amount in rules promulgated pursuant to subsection (2)(c)(II)(B) of this section, the Colorado outdoor recreation backcountry search and rescue card costs three dollars and is valid for one year from the date of purchase. The division shall charge vendors two dollars for each Colorado outdoor recreation backcountry search and rescue card, which shall be transmitted to the state treasurer, who shall credit the amount to the backcountry search and rescue fund created in subsection (1) of this section. The remaining one dollar shall be retained by the vendor as the vendor's fee.

(B) On or after January 1, 2023, the commission shall promulgate rules establishing the price and vendor fee for the Colorado outdoor recreation backcountry search and rescue card. Money from the sale of the cards shall be transmitted to the state treasurer, who shall credit the amount to the backcountry search and rescue fund created in subsection (1) of this section.

(III) The division may issue a multi-year Colorado outdoor recreation backcountry search and rescue card that is valid for a period not to exceed five years. The multi-year card may be offered at a reduced rate to vendors with a reduced vendor fee to reflect administrative cost savings and other considerations.

(IV) The general assembly finds and declares that the Colorado outdoor recreation backcountry search and rescue card program is a new program. Prior to January 1, 2023, the department of local affairs is authorized to contract, pursuant to section 24-50-504 (2)(b), with a person, corporation, or entity for any elements of the administration of the program created by this subsection (2)(c). On and after January 1, 2023, the division assumes the rights, responsibilities, and obligations of the department of local affairs under any contract entered into pursuant to this subsection (2)(c)(IV) and is authorized to contract, pursuant to section 24-50-504 (2)(b), with a person, corporation, or entity for any elements of the administration of the program created by this subsection (2)(c).

[Editor's note: This version of subsection (3) is effective until January 1, 2023.] All agencies and political subdivisions of the state shall have the right to make a claim on the backcountry search and rescue fund for reimbursement of costs incurred in the performance of backcountry search and rescue activities involving those persons specified in subsection (1) of this section. Such claims shall be submitted to the department of local affairs for immediate consideration. Any reimbursement claims which have been certified by the sheriff of the county in which the backcountry search and rescue activity occurred shall be eligible for payment by the department of local affairs. The department of local affairs shall establish rules for the procedure through which claims shall be submitted and for payment of such claims.

(3)

[

Editor's note: This version of subsection (3) is effective January 1, 2023.

]

All agencies and political subdivisions of the state have the right to make a request for reimbursement from the backcountry search and rescue fund for costs incurred in the performance of backcountry search and rescue activities involving those persons specified in subsection (1)(c)(II) of this section. Such requests shall be submitted to the division for immediate consideration. Any reimbursement requests which have been certified by the sheriff of the county in which the backcountry search and rescue activity occurred shall be eligible for payment by the division. The division shall establish the procedure through which requests must be submitted and for payment of such requests.

[Editor's note: This version of subsection (4) is effective until January 1, 2023.] The backcountry search and rescue fund created in subsection (1) of this section shall be the sole source of funds for the reimbursement of costs incurred under this section in backcountry search and rescue activities involving those persons specified in subsection (1) of this section. The wildlife cash fund established in section 33-1-112 and the parks and outdoor recreation cash fund established in section 33-10-111 shall not be used for reimbursement of costs as provided in this section.

(4)

[

Editor's note: This version of subsection (4) is effective January 1, 2023.

]

The wildlife cash fund established in section 33-1-112 and the parks and outdoor recreation cash fund established in section 33-10-111 shall not be used for reimbursement of costs as provided in subsection (1)(c)(II) of this section.

The money in the backcountry search and rescue fund created in subsection (1) of this section shall be subject to annual appropriation by the general assembly for the direct and indirect costs of the administration of this section.

This subsection (5) is repealed, effective January 1, 2023.

[Editor's note: This version of subsection (6) is effective until January 1, 2023.] At the close of any fiscal year, all of the money remaining in the backcountry search and rescue fund and appropriated for backcountry search and rescue expenses, after all approved claims and administrative costs have been paid, shall be divided among those counties that have applied to the department of local affairs for year-end grants or reimbursements from the backcountry search and rescue fund. The department of local affairs shall divide such money among the counties, first making payment for uncompensated backcountry searches and rescues of parents, siblings, spouses, children, or grandchildren of persons holding hunting or fishing licenses, vessel, snowmobile, or off-highway vehicle registrations, or the owner of a Colorado outdoor recreation backcountry search and rescue card and second making payment for backcountry-search-and-rescue-related training and equipment, and for any other uncompensated backcountry search and rescue incidents. The department of local affairs shall establish operating procedures for applying for year-end grants or reimbursements from the money remaining in the backcountry search and rescue fund.

(6)

[

Editor's note: This version of subsection (6) is effective January 1, 2023.

]

At the close of any fiscal year, money remaining in the backcountry search and rescue fund that was credited to the fund pursuant to subsection (2) of this section, after all approved requests for reimbursement and administrative costs have been paid, shall be used first to pay for unreimbursed backcountry search and rescue incidents and then shall be divided among counties that have applied to the division for year-end grants from the backcountry search and rescue fund. The division shall establish operating procedures for applying for year-end grants in accordance with this subsection (6).

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2001, p. 599, § 1, effective July 1, 2001.)

Within three days after June 21, 2021, the state treasurer shall transfer two million two hundred fifty thousand dollars from the general fund to the backcountry search and rescue fund for use by the department of local affairs in consultation with the division to support backcountry search and rescue efforts, including to cover response costs, equipment, and other related expenses. On and after January 1, 2023, any unspent money from the transfer made pursuant to this subsection (9)(a) is for use by the division pursuant to subsection (1)(c)(I) of this section.

The restrictions on use of money set forth in this section do not apply to the department of local affairs' use, prior to January 1, 2023, of the money transferred pursuant to subsection (9)(a) of this section. On and after January 1, 2023, the division may use the money transferred pursuant to subsection (9)(a) of this section in accordance with subsection (1)(c)(I) of this section.

On January 2, 2023, if there is any unobligated and unexpended money from the transfer required by section 33-1-112 (1.7)(a) in the wildlife cash fund created in section 33-1-112 (1), the state treasurer shall transfer the remaining money from the wildlife cash fund to the backcountry search and rescue fund on that date.

This subsection (9) is repealed, effective September 1, 2024.

On and after January 1, 2023, the division shall execute, administer, perform, and enforce the rights, powers, duties, functions, and obligations previously vested under this section in the department of local affairs.

Effective January 1, 2023, all positions of employment and appropriations for personal services in the department of local affairs related to performing the powers, duties, and functions transferred to the division pursuant to this subsection (10) and determined by the division to be necessary to carry out the purposes of this section are transferred to the division and are employment positions therein. All such employees are employees of the division and retain all rights under the state personnel system and to retirement benefits pursuant to the laws of this state, and their services are deemed continuous.

All rules and policies of the department of local affairs adopted pursuant to this section and in effect as of January 1, 2023, continue to be effective and shall be enforced by the division until superseded, revised, amended, repealed, or nullified pursuant to law. The division shall adopt any rules or policies necessary for the administration of this section and as otherwise authorized by law. Before initiating its first rule-making or adopting initial policies pursuant to this subsection (10)(c), the division shall consult with the county sheriffs and the Colorado search and rescue association for input on changes that are necessary to administer this section.

Any requests for reimbursement submitted to the department of local affairs prior to January 1, 2023, pursuant to subsection (3) of this section that have not been processed or paid on January 1, 2023, are transferred to the division for immediate consideration and payment pursuant to rules adopted by the department of local affairs, until such rules are superseded, revised, repealed, or amended by the division.

Any suit, action, or other proceeding, judicial or administrative, related to the administration of this section and lawfully commenced, or which could have been commenced, by or against the department of local affairs, or any officer thereof in such officer's official capacity or in relation to the discharge of the official's duties under this section, is abated by reason of the transfer of duties and functions to the division pursuant to this subsection (10).

Source:

L. 87:

Entire section added, p. 1266, § 2, effective January 1, 1988.

L. 89:

(2) amended, p. 1343, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 91:

(2) amended, p. 1920, § 46, effective June 1.

L. 92:

(1), (2), (3), and (4) amended and (6) added, p. 1906, § 1, effective June 1.

L. 94:

(1), (2)(a), (5) and (6) amended, p. 1733, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 95:

(3) and (6) amended and (7) and (8) added, p. 475, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 96:

(2)(b) amended, p. 779, § 2, effective May 23.

L. 2001:

(1), (2)(a), (6), (7), and (8) amended and (2)(c) added, p. 599, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2005:

(2)(a) amended, p. 474, § 5, effective January 1, 2006.

L. 2021:

(9) added, (HB 21-1326), ch. 274, p. 1592, § 3, effective June 21; entire section amended, (SB 21-245), ch. 358, p. 2336, § 4, effective June 27.

L. 2022:

(9)(a) and (9)(b) amended and (9)(b.5) and (10) added, (SB 22-168), ch. 296, p. 2114, § 2, effective June 1; (1), (2), (3), (4), and (6) amended (SB 22-168), ch. 296, p. 2114, § 2, effective January 1, 2023; (5)(b) added by revision, ch. 296, pp. 2114, 2121, §§ 2, 7.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in SB 21-245, see section 1 of chapter 358, Session Laws of Colorado 2021.

33-1-113. Expenses of employees.

In addition to their salaries, all employees of the division shall be reimbursed for all actual and necessary expenses incurred by them in the discharge of their official duties.

In addition to the compensation paid employees of the division and in addition to reimbursement for expenses as provided in subsection (1) of this section, each employee of the division who is vested with the rights and powers of a Colorado wildlife officer, including and limited to area wildlife managers and district wildlife managers, shall, because of the number of hours and the extraordinary service performed by such employees and the requirement of purchasing necessary uniform items, be further reimbursed for maintenance and ordinary expenses incurred in the performance of their duties in such amount as shall be determined by the commission, but the amount authorized under this subsection (2) for any such employee of the division shall not exceed the sum of fifty dollars per month.

Source:

L. 84:

Entire article R&RE, p. 860, § 1, effective January 1, 1985.

L. 2003:

(2) amended, p. 1630, § 67, effective August 6; (2) amended, p. 1954, § 48, effective August 6.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 33-1-117 as it existed prior to 1984.

33-1-114. Conservation magazine - revenue - Colorado outdoors magazine revolving fund.

The division is authorized to distribute a conservation magazine and associated informational products. The revenue derived therefrom shall be deposited in the state treasury and credited to the Colorado outdoors magazine revolving fund, which fund is hereby created. The magazine, subject to the approval of the executive director, shall be issued in accordance with the provisions of section 24-1-136, C.R.S. Funds necessary for the publication and distribution of such magazine and associated products shall be expended from the revolving fund, and additional funds, if necessary, will be included in the division's annual budget of wildlife cash funds. Such conservation magazine and associated informational products may be sold by the division or by any person designated by such division pursuant to contract. Any surplus in the revolving fund in excess of one hundred thousand dollars shall revert to the wildlife cash fund at the close of each fiscal year.

If a private business manufactures and produces for sale a product that is available on the commercial market and the division is not currently producing such product, such product, or one substantially similar, shall not be produced or offered for sale by the division for so long as such product remains available from a private business.

Source:

L. 84:

Entire article R&RE, p. 860, § 1, effective January 1, 1985.

L. 94:

Entire section amended, p. 1214, § 1, effective May 22.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 33-1-118 as it existed prior to 1984.

33-1-115. Migratory birds - possession of raptors - reciprocal agreements.

The open season for all migratory game birds in the state of Colorado shall be the same as that fixed, or as may be fixed, under the administrative provisions of the federal "Migratory Bird Treaty Act", 16 U.S.C. sec. 703 to 711, as amended. Any change made by the United States department of the interior, fish and wildlife service, or any new ruling made by the secretary of the interior under said act which is applicable to the state of Colorado shall be in effect in the state of Colorado and shall be enforced by the division. The term "migratory birds" includes birds defined as such under the administrative provisions of said "Migratory Bird Treaty Act" and regulations adopted pursuant to the provisions of said act.

The commission shall issue licenses in accordance with its regulations to permit the possession of raptors for falconry and captive breeding purposes and to encourage individual efforts to propagate the species. The commission shall actively pursue the establishment of reciprocal agreements with other states and Canada as a signatory to the "Migratory Bird Treaty Act", which agreements shall allow for the taking, use, and transportation of raptors from each respective area by qualified and licensed applicants.

Applicants from other states or Canadian provinces or territories which are signatories to the "Migratory Bird Treaty Act" and have reciprocal raptor agreements with Colorado may obtain nonthreatened raptors in reasonable numbers commensurate with raptor populations within this state. The commission may issue nonresident take licenses to such applicants, and the fees for such licenses shall be equivalent to the fees for comparable licenses in the states, provinces, or territories with which Colorado holds such agreements.

It is the intent of the general assembly for the commission to make the rules of this state conform to or be more stringent than the provisions of the "Migratory Bird Treaty Act", as amended, and the "Endangered Species Act of 1973", as amended. These rules may include, but not be limited to, captive breeding and the use of domestic captive bred raptors and the purchase, sale, transportation, importation, exportation, or exchange of raptors with persons having like licenses.

Repealed.

Source:

L. 84:

Entire article R&RE, p. 860, § 1, effective January 1, 1985.

L. 94:

(2) amended and (3) added, p. 1577, § 2, effective May 31.

L. 2002:

(3) repealed, p. 877, § 3, effective August 7.

L. 2007:

(2)(c) amended, p. 2046, § 87, effective June 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 33-20-102 as it existed prior to 1984.

Cross references:

For the "Endangered Species Act of 1973", see Pub.L. 93-205, codified at 16 U.S.C. § 1531 et seq.

33-1-116. Powers of director of United States fish and wildlife service.

The director of the United States fish and wildlife service and his duly authorized agents have the right within this state to conduct fish hatching and fish culture activities and all other operations connected therewith that the said director may consider necessary and proper. Nothing in sections 33-1-116 to 33-1-119 shall be construed as permitting or granting to the said director or his duly authorized agents any jurisdiction over or the right to interfere with the activities or facilities of the division, nor shall anything in said sections be construed as contravening any of the laws of this state relating to public health, pollution, or water rights.

Source:

L. 84:

Entire article R&RE, p. 861, § 1, effective January 1, 1985.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 33-2-102 as it existed prior to 1984.

33-1-117. Assent of state to Pittman-Robertson act.

The state of Colorado through the division assents to the provisions of the act of congress entitled "An Act to provide that the United States shall aid the states in wildlife restoration projects, and for other purposes.", approved September 2, 1937, and as amended. The division is authorized to perform such acts as may be necessary to conduct and establish cooperative wildlife restoration projects, as defined in such act, in compliance with such act and the rules and regulations promulgated by the secretary of the interior thereunder. No moneys or funds accruing to the division pursuant to such act shall be used for any purpose other than for such projects and the administration of the division, but the division may pay into the general fund as a part of its administrative costs a reasonable rental or service charge, as it may determine, for office quarters and auditing, bookkeeping, and like services furnished to the division by the state. All moneys now in the wildlife cash fund, or accrued or accruing to or received or receivable by the division, pursuant to such act shall be appropriated to pay for the administrative expense of such division for the protection, preservation, restoration, and control of wildlife of the state and to cover expenses in enforcing the wildlife laws of the state. Such moneys are to be expended upon a voucher approved by the director or an employee of the department authorized by the executive director and a warrant drawn by the controller.

Source:

L. 84:

Entire article R&RE, p. 861, § 1, effective January 1, 1985.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 33-2-104 as it existed prior to 1984.

Cross references:

For the "Pittman-Robertson Wildlife Restoration Act", see Pub.L. 75-415, codified at 16 U.S.C. § 669 et seq.

33-1-118. Assent to Dingell-Johnson act.

The state of Colorado through the division assents to the provisions of the act of congress entitled "An Act to provide that the United States shall aid the states in fish restoration and management projects, and for other purposes.", approved August 9, 1950, and as amended. The division is authorized and directed to perform such acts as may be necessary to conduct and establish cooperative fish restoration and management projects as defined in and in compliance with such act of congress and the rules and regulations promulgated by the secretary of the interior thereunder. No moneys or funds accruing to the division as a result of compliance with such act shall be used for any purpose other than for such projects and the administration of such division.

Source:

L. 84:

Entire article R&RE, p. 861, § 1, effective January 1, 1985.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 33-2-105 as it existed prior to 1984.

Cross references:

For the "Dingell-Johnson Sport Fish Restoration Act", see Pub.L. 81-681, codified at 16 U.S.C. § 777 et seq.

33-1-119. Federal aid projects income fund.

There is hereby created a fund designated as the federal aid projects income fund to which shall be deposited certain revenues and earnings derived from properties purchased and operated jointly by the United States government and the state of Colorado under the provisions of sections 33-1-116 to 33-1-119, and the provisions of the acts of congress referred to in this article, and the rules and regulations of the United States department of the interior. Such revenues and earnings so deposited shall be limited to those specific revenues and earnings to which each has a right under the provisions of cooperative agreements establishing such rights. All moneys deposited under the provisions of this section are specifically appropriated for the purposes for which such moneys may accrue.

Source:

L. 84:

Entire article R&RE, p. 862, § 1, effective January 1, 1985.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 33-2-106 as it existed prior to 1984.

33-1-120. Limitation on division and commission authority.

Neither the commission nor the division shall enter into any mitigation agreements with any agency of the federal government relating to the transfer or exchange of land or water condemned by the federal government without the express consent of the general assembly.

The provisions of subsection (1) of this section shall not be construed to prevent the commission or the division from entering into common agreements with a federal agency pertaining to the stocking of fish or management of other wildlife on federally owned lands.

The programs of the commission and division, including the listing of threatened and endangered species, shall not be utilized by the commission or division to supersede, abrogate, or impair any water right. For the purposes of this subsection (3), "impair" means requiring water users to forego water to which they are entitled under a water right.

Source:

L. 84:

Entire article R&RE, p. 862, § 1, effective January 1, 1985.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 33-1-113 as it existed prior to 1984.

33-1-120.5. Oversight of the division - target dates for implementation of management review recommendations.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires, "management review recommendations" means the recommendations made by Deloitte Touche LLP in the management review final report dated June 5, 1995.

There is hereby established a deadline of no later than January 1, 1998, for the division to implement the management review recommendations.

The director shall:

Establish a schedule for the implementation of the management review recommendations;

Repealed.

Make decisions concerning the implementation of or departure from review recommendations in conjunction with the executive director of the department of natural resources and the commission.

The director shall have the authority to reimburse or compensate employees relocated due to the implementation of the management review in the following manner:

The cost of all reasonable and necessary moving expenses incurred by an employee for the packing and unpacking, insurance, transportation, storage in transit, and installation of household effects shall be reimbursed.

Notwithstanding subparagraph (I) of this paragraph (a), no reimbursement shall be paid for expenses incurred for insurance, transportation, or storage in transit to the extent such expenses cover a period longer than sixty days, nor shall reimbursement be paid for expenses incurred for household effects exceeding eighteen thousand pounds weight.

Reimbursement is authorized for expenses charged by commercial business establishments for renting trailers or trucks for the purpose of moving household effects and for towing house trailers containing the household effects of employees. If such expenses exceed one thousand dollars, the claim therefor shall be accompanied by two competitive bids. Reimbursement shall be made at the rate proposed in the lowest bid. Any employee who performs his or her own packing and moving shall be reimbursed at the rate of fifty percent of the lowest commercial moving bid, not to exceed two thousand five hundred dollars.

When the director requires an employee to relocate due to the implementation of the management review, such employee shall receive a per diem allowance for not more than sixty days for the necessary and reasonable expenses incurred in locating a primary residence at the new location. Such sixty-day period shall be tolled during any interruption caused by sick leave, vacation, or other authorized leave of absence or ordered travel.

No reimbursement rate under this subsection (4) shall exceed a rate established by executive order. The per diem rate for dependent children between the ages of twelve and eighteen years and the spouse or partner of an employee shall not exceed seventy-five percent of the rate established by executive order for employees. The per diem rate for dependent children of an employee who are less than twelve years of age shall not exceed fifty percent of the rate established by executive order for employees.

Source:

L. 96:

Entire section added, p. 1350, § 3, effective June 1.

L. 2002:

(3)(b) repealed, p. 877, § 4, effective August 7.

L. 2012:

(3)(c) amended, (HB 12-1317), ch. 248, p. 1208, § 18, effective June 4.

33-1-121. Captive wildlife and alternative livestock board - created - duties - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 94:

Entire section added, p. 1694, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 99:

(6) amended, p. 533, § 1, effective May 3.

L. 2004:

(3)(a) amended, p. 1324, § 3, effective August 4.

Editor's note:

Subsection (6) provided for the repeal of this section, effective July 1, 2009. (See L. 99, p. 533.)

33-1-122. Wildlife legislative interim committee. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 95:

Entire section added, p. 1013, § 3, effective May 25.

Editor's note:

Subsection (7) provided for the repeal of this section, effective January 1, 1996. (See L. 95, p. 1013.)

33-1-123. Division - predator management plan - predator management advisory committee - creation - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2000:

Entire section added, p. 1380, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

Subsection (6) provided for the repeal of this section, effective July 1, 2001. (See L. 2000, p. 1380.)